California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall also designate, as the agent of the corporation for the purpose of service of process, a natural person residing in this state or any domestic or foreign or foreign business corporation that has complied with Section 1505 and whose capacity to act as an agent has not terminated. If a natural person is designated, the statement shall set forth the person’s complete business or residence street address. If a corporate agent is designated, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the
 applicable filing period for a corporation shall be the calendar month during which its original articles were filed and the immediately preceding five calendar months. The Secretary of State shall provide a notice to each corporation to comply with this section approximately three months before the close of the applicable filing period. The notice shall state the due date for compliance and shall be sent to the last address of the corporation according to the records of the Secretary of State or to the last electronic mail address according to the records of the Secretary of State if the corporation has elected to receive notices from the Secretary of State by electronic mail. Neither the failure of the Secretary of State to send the notice nor the failure of the corporation to receive it is an excuse for failure to comply with this section.

(d) Whenever any of the information required by subdivision (a) is changed, the corporation may file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). In order to change its agent for service of process or the address of the agent, the corporation must file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). Whenever any statement is filed pursuant to this section, it supersedes any previously filed statement and the statement in the articles as to the agent for service of process and the address of the agent.

(e) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any statement filed pursuant to this section after it has been superseded by the filing of a new statement.

(f) This section does
 not place any person dealing with the corporation on notice of, or under any duty to inquire about, the existence or content of a statement filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 66.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8211.

(a) An agent designated for service of process pursuant to Section 8210 may deliver to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, a signed and acknowledged written statement of resignation as an agent for service of process containing the name of the corporation, the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation, the name of the resigning agent for service of process, and a statement that the agent is resigning. Thereupon the authority of the agent to act in that capacity shall cease and the Secretary of State forthwith shall mail or otherwise provide written notice of the filing of the statement of resignation to the corporation at its principal office.

(b) The resignation of an agent may be effective if, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the name of the corporation, the Secretary of State’s file number for the corporation, and the name of the agent for service of process, the agent disclaims having been properly appointed as the agent. Similarly, a person named as an officer or director may indicate that the person was never properly appointed as the officer or director.

(c) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any statement of resignation filed pursuant to this section after a new form is filed pursuant to Section 8210 replacing the agent for service of process that has resigned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 15.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8212.

If a natural person who has been designated agent for service of process pursuant to Section 8210 dies or resigns or no longer resides in the state or if the corporate agent for such purpose resigns, dissolves, withdraws from the state, forfeits its right to transact intrastate business, has its corporate rights, powers and privileges suspended or ceases to exist, the corporation shall forthwith file a designation of a new agent conforming to the requirements of Section 8210.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8214.

Upon request of an assessor, a corporation owning, claiming, possessing or controlling property in this state subject to local assessment shall make available at the corporation’s principal office in California or at a place mutually acceptable to the assessor and the corporation a true copy of business records relevant to the amount, cost and value of all property that it owns, claims, possesses or controls within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8215.

Any officers, directors, employees or agents of a corporation who do any of the following are liable jointly and severally for all the damages resulting therefrom to the corporation or any person injured thereby who relied thereupon or to both:

(a) Make, issue, deliver or publish any prospectus, report, circular, certificate, financial statement, balance sheet, public notice or document respecting the corporation or its memberships, assets, liabilities, capital, dividends, business, earnings or accounts which is false in any material respect, knowing it to be false, or participate in the making, issuance, delivery or publication thereof with knowledge that the same is false in a material respect.

(b) Make or cause to be made in the books, minutes, records or accounts of a corporation any entry which is false in any material particular knowing such entry is false.

(c) Remove, erase, alter or cancel any entry in any books or records of the corporation, with intent to deceive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8216.

(a) The Attorney General, upon complaint of a member, director or officer, that a corporation is failing to comply with the provisions of this chapter, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 7510), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 7610) or Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 8310), may, in the name of the people of the State of California, send to the principal office of such corporation, (or, if there is no such office, to the office or residence of the chief executive officer or secretary, of the corporation, as set forth in the most recent statement filed pursuant to Section 8210) notice of the complaint. If the answer is not satisfactory, or if there is no answer within 30 days, the Attorney General may institute, maintain or intervene in such suits, actions, or proceedings of any type in any court or tribunal of competent jurisdiction or before any administrative agency for such relief by way of injunction, the dissolution of entities, the appointment of receivers or any other temporary, preliminary, provisional or final remedies as may be appropriate to protect the rights of members or to undo the consequences of failure to comply with such requirements. In any such action, suit or proceeding there may be joined as parties all persons and entities responsible for or affected by such activity.

(b) In the case of a corporation where the action concerns assets held in charitable trust, the Attorney General may bring an action under subdivision (a) without having received a complaint, and without first giving notice of a complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8217.

(a) No corporation formed under this part for the sole purpose of operating a single ridesharing vanpool vehicle designed for transporting at least seven persons, including the driver, under an arrangement in which ridesharing is incidental to another purpose of the driver shall be subject to the payment of any fee under provisions of the Government Code for any filing required by this part.

(b) For purposes of this section, “ridesharing” shall have the meaning specified in Section 522 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1563, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Records, Reports, and Rights of Inspection [8310. - 8338.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8310. - 8313.]

8310.

If any record subject to inspection pursuant to this chapter is not maintained in written form, a request for inspection is not complied with unless and until the corporation at its expense makes such record available in written form. For the purposes of this chapter “written” or “in writing” also includes cathode ray tube and similar electronic communications methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 662, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

8311.

Any inspection under this chapter may be made in person or by agent or attorney and the right of inspection includes the right to copy and make extracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8312.

Any right of inspection created by this chapter extends to the records of each subsidiary of a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8313.

The rights of members provided in this chapter may not be limited by contract or the articles or bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Required Records, Reports to Directors and Members [8320. - 8325.]

8320.

(a) Each corporation shall keep:

(1) Adequate and correct books and records of account:

(2) Minutes of the proceedings of its members, board and committees of the board; and

(3) A record of its members giving their names and addresses and the class of membership held by each.

(b) Those minutes and other books and records shall be kept either in written form or in any other form capable of being converted into clearly legible tangible form or in any combination of the foregoing. When minutes and other books and records are kept in a form capable of being converted into clearly legible paper form, the clearly legible paper form into which those minutes and other books and records are converted shall be admissible in evidence, and accepted for all other purposes, to the same extent as an original paper record of the same information would have been, provided that the paper form accurately portrays the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8321.

(a) A corporation shall notify each member yearly of the member’s right to receive a financial report pursuant to this subdivision. Except as provided in subdivision (c), upon written request of a member, the board shall promptly cause the most recent annual report to be sent to the requesting member. An annual report shall be prepared not later than 120 days after the close of the corporation’s fiscal year. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws and if approved by the board of directors, that report and any accompanying material may be sent by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20). That report shall contain in appropriate detail the following:

(1) A balance sheet as of the end of that fiscal year and an income statement and a statement of cashflows for that fiscal year.

(2) A statement of the place where the names and addresses of the current members are located.

(3) Any information required by Section 8322.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by any report thereon of independent accountants, or, if there is no report, the certificate of an authorized officer of the corporation that the statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the corporation.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any corporation that receives less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in gross revenues or receipts during the fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 214, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8322.

(a) Any provision of the articles or bylaws notwithstanding, every corporation shall furnish annually to its members and directors a statement of any transaction or indemnification of a kind described in subdivision (d) or (e), if any such transaction or indemnification took place. If the corporation issues an annual report to all members, this subdivision shall be satisfied by including the required information in the annual report. A corporation which does not issue an annual report to all members, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8321, shall satisfy this section by mailing or delivering to its members the required statement within 120 days after the close of the corporation’s fiscal year. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws and if approved by the board of directors, that statement may be sent by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a covered transaction under this section is a transaction in which the corporation, its parent, or its subsidiary was a party, and in which either of the following had a direct or indirect material financial interest:

(1) Any director or officer of the corporation, or its parent or subsidiary. 

(2) Any holder of more than 10 percent of the voting power of the corporation, its parent or its subsidiary.

For the purpose of subdivision (d), an “interested person” is any person described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subdivision.

(c) Transactions approved by the members of a corporation (Section 5034), under subdivision (a) of Section 7233, are not covered transactions. For the purpose of subdivision (b), a mere common directorship is not a material financial interest.

(d) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall describe briefly:

(1) Any covered transaction (excluding compensation of officers and directors) during the previous fiscal year involving more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or which was one of a number of covered transactions in which the same interested person had a direct or indirect material financial interest, and which transactions in the aggregate involved more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) The names of the interested persons involved in such transactions, stating such person’s relationship to the corporation, the nature of such person’s interest in the transaction and, where practicable, the amount of such interest; provided, that in the case of a transaction with a partnership of which such person is a partner, only the interest of the partnership need be stated.

(e) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall describe briefly the amount and circumstances of any loans, guaranties, indemnifications or advances aggregating more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) paid or made during the fiscal year to any officer or director of the corporation pursuant to Section 7237; provided that no such report need be made in the case of a loan, guaranty, or indemnification approved by the members (Section 5034) or a loan or guaranty not subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 7235.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8323.

(a) The superior court of the proper county shall enforce the duty of making and mailing or delivering the information and financial statements required by this article and, for good cause shown, may extend the time therefor.

(b) In any action or proceeding under this section, if the court finds the failure of the corporation to comply with the requirements of this article to have been without justification, the court may award the member reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, in connection with such action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8324.

(a) Nothing in this part relieves a corporation from the requirements of Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Government Code as to any assets held in charitable trust including, without limitation, subdivision (a) of Section 12586. If a report sent to the Attorney General in compliance with the requirements of Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Government Code includes the information required in the annual report, then the corporation may furnish a copy of its report to the Attorney General in lieu of the annual report, whenever it is required to furnish an annual report.

(b) A
 corporation shall furnish any member who so requests a copy of any report filed by the corporation pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Government Code. The corporation may impose reasonable charges for copying and mailing a report furnished under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 20.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8325.

For a period of 60 days following the conclusion of an annual, regular, or special meeting of members, a corporation shall, upon written request from a member, forthwith inform the member of the result of any particular vote of members taken at the meeting, including the number of memberships voting for, the number of memberships voting against, and the number of memberships abstaining or withheld from voting. If the matter voted on was the election of directors, the corporation shall report the number of memberships, or votes if voted cumulatively, cast for each nominee for director. If more than one class or series of memberships voted, the report shall state the appropriate numbers by class and series of memberships.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 453, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rights of Inspection [8330. - 8338.]

8330.

(a) Subject to Sections 8331 and 8332, and unless the corporation provides a reasonable alternative pursuant to subdivision (c), a member may do either or both of the following as permitted by subdivision (b):

(1) Inspect and copy the record of all the members’ names, addresses and voting rights, at reasonable times, upon five business days’ prior written demand upon the corporation which demand shall state the purpose for which the inspection rights are requested; or

(2) Obtain from the secretary of the corporation, upon written demand and tender of a reasonable charge, a list of the names, addresses and voting rights of those members entitled to vote for the election of directors, as of the most recent record date for which it has been compiled or as of a date specified by the member subsequent to the date of demand. The demand shall state the purpose for which the list is requested. The membership list shall be made available on or before the later of ten business days after the demand is received or after the date specified therein as the date as of which the list is to be compiled.

(b) The rights set forth in subdivision (a) may be exercised by:

(1) Any member, for a purpose reasonably related to such person’s interest as a member. Where the corporation reasonably believes that the information will be used for another purpose, or where it provides a reasonable alternative pursuant to subdivision (c), it may deny the member access to the list. In any subsequent action brought by the member under Section 8336, the court shall enforce the rights set forth in subdivision (a) unless the corporation proves that the member will allow use of the information for purposes unrelated to the person’s interest as a member or that the alternative method offered reasonably achieves the proper purpose set forth in the demand.

(2) The authorized number of members for a purpose reasonably related to the members’ interest as members.

(c) The corporation may, within ten business days after receiving a demand under subdivision (a), deliver to the person or persons making the demand a written offer of an alternative method of achieving the purpose identified in said demand without providing access to or a copy of the membership list. An alternative method which reasonably and in a timely manner accomplishes the proper purpose set forth in a demand made under subdivision (a) shall be deemed a reasonable alternative, unless within a reasonable time after acceptance of the offer the corporation fails to do those things which it offered to do. Any rejection of the offer shall be in writing and shall indicate the reasons the alternative proposed by the corporation does not meet the proper purpose of the demand made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8331.

(a) Where the corporation, in good faith, and with a substantial basis, believes that the membership list, demanded under Section 8330 by the authorized number (Section 5036), will be used for a purpose not reasonably related to the interests as members of the person or persons making the demand (hereinafter called the requesting parties) as members or provides a reasonable alternative pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8330, it may petition the superior court of the proper county for an order setting aside the demand.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a petition for an order to show cause why a protective order pursuant to subdivision (d) should not issue shall be filed within 10 business days after the demand by the authorized number under Section 8330 or receipt of a written rejection by the authorized number of an offer made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8330, whichever is later. The petition shall be accompanied by an application for a hearing on the petition. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall issue a protective order staying production of the list demanded until the hearing on the order to show cause. The court shall set the hearing on the order to show cause not more than 20 days from the date of the filing of the petition. The order to show cause shall be granted unless the court finds that there is no reasonable probability that the corporation will make the showing required under subdivision (f).

(c) A corporation may file a petition under this section more than 10 business days after the demand or rejection under Section 8330, but only upon a showing the delay was caused by excusable neglect. In no event, however, may any petition under this section be considered if filed more than 30 days after the requesting parties’ demand or rejection, whichever is later.

(d) Upon the return day of the order to show cause, the court may issue a protective order staying production of the list demanded until final adjudication of the petition filed pursuant to this section. No protective order shall issue under this subdivision unless the court finds that the rights of the requesting parties can reasonably be preserved and that the corporation is likely to make the showing required by subdivision (f) or the court is likely to issue a protective order pursuant to subdivision (g).

(e) If the corporation fails to file a petition within the time allowed by subdivision (b) or (c), whichever is applicable, or fails to obtain a protective order under subdivision (d), then the corporation shall comply with the demand, and no further action may be brought by the corporation under this section.

(f) The court shall issue the final order setting aside the demand only if the corporation proves:

(1) That there is a reasonable probability that the requesting parties will permit use of the membership list for a purpose unrelated to their interests as members; or

(2) That the method offered by the corporation is a reasonable alternative in that it reasonably achieves the proper purpose set forth in the requesting parties’ demand and that the corporation intends and is able to effectuate the reasonable alternative.

(g) In the final order, the court may, in its discretion, order an alternate mechanism for achieving the proper purposes of the requesting parties, or impose just and proper conditions upon the use of the membership list which reasonably assures compliance with Section 8330 and Section 8338.

(h) The court shall award reasonable costs and expenses including reasonable attorneys’ fees, to requesting parties who successfully oppose any petition or application filed pursuant to this section.

(i) Where the corporation has neither, within the time allowed, complied with a demand by the authorized number (Section 5036) under Section 8330, nor obtained a protective order staying production of the list, or a final order setting aside the demand, which is then in effect, the requesting parties may petition the superior court of the proper county for a writ of mandamus pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure compelling the corporation to comply with the demand. At the hearing, the court shall hear the parties summarily, by affidavit or otherwise, and shall issue a peremptory writ of mandamus unless it appears that the demand was not made by an authorized number (Section 5036), that the demand has been complied with, that the corporation, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8330, made an offer which was not rejected in writing within a reasonable time, or that a protective or final order properly issued under subdivision (d), (f) or (g) is then in effect. No inquiry may be made in such proceeding into the use for which the authorized number seek the list. The court shall award reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, to persons granted an order under this subdivision.

(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of the corporation to obtain damages for any misuse of a membership list obtained under Section 8330, or otherwise, or to obtain injunctive relief necessary to restrain misuse of a member list. A corporation shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred in successfully bringing any such action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8332.

(a) Upon petition of the corporation or any member, the superior court of the proper county may limit or restrict the rights set forth in Section 8330 where, and only where, such limitation or restriction is necessary to protect the rights of any member under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of the State of California. An order issued pursuant to this subdivision shall provide, insofar as possible, for alternative mechanisms by which the persons seeking to exercise rights under Section 8330 may communicate with members for purposes reasonably related to their interests as members.

(b) Upon the filing of a petition under subdivision (a), the court may, if requested by the person making the petition, issue a temporary order suspending the running of any time limit specified in Section 8330 for compliance with that section. Such an order may be extended, after notice and hearing, until final adjudication of the petition, wherever it appears that the petitioner may prevail on the merits, and it is otherwise equitable to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8333.

The accounting books and records and minutes of proceedings of the members and the board and committees of the board shall be open to inspection upon the written demand on the corporation of any member at any reasonable time, for a purpose reasonably related to such person’s interests as a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8334.

Every director shall have the absolute right at any reasonable time to inspect and copy all books, records and documents of every kind and to inspect the physical properties of the corporation of which such person is a director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8335.

Where the proper purpose of the person or persons making a demand pursuant to Section 8330 is frustrated by (1) any delay by the corporation in complying with a demand under Section 8330 beyond the time limits specified therein, or (2) any delay caused by the filing of a petition under Section 8331 or Section 8332, or (3) any delay caused by the alternative proposed under subdivision (c) of Section 8330, the person or persons properly making the demand shall have, in the discretion of the court, a right to obtain from the superior court an order postponing any members’ meeting previously noticed for a period equal to the period of such delay. The members may obtain such an order in a proceeding brought pursuant to Section 8331 upon the filing of a verified complaint in the proper county and after a hearing, notice of which shall be given to such persons and in such manner as the court may direct. Such right shall be in addition to any other legal or equitable remedies to which the member may be entitled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8336.

(a) Upon refusal of a lawful demand for inspection under this chapter, or a lawful demand pursuant to Section 8330 or Section 8333, the superior court of the proper county, or the county where the books or records in question are kept, may enforce the demand or right of inspection with just and proper conditions or may, for good cause shown, appoint one or more competent inspectors or independent accountants to audit the financial statements kept in this state and investigate the property, funds and affairs of any corporation and of any subsidiary corporation thereof, domestic or foreign, keeping records in this state and to report thereon in such manner as the court may direct.

(b) All officers and agents of the corporation shall produce to the inspectors or accountants so appointed all books and documents in their custody or power, under penalty of punishment for contempt of court.

(c) All expenses of the investigation or audit shall be defrayed by the applicant unless the court orders them to be paid or shared by the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8337.

In any action or proceeding under this article, and except as required by Section 8331, if the court finds the failure of the corporation to comply with a proper demand thereunder was without justification, the court may award the member reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, in connection with such action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8338.

(a) A membership list is a corporate asset. Without consent of the board a membership list or any part thereof may not be obtained or used by any person for any purpose not reasonably related to a member’s interest as a member. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, without the consent of the board a membership list or any part thereof may not be:

(1) Used to solicit money or property unless such money or property will be used solely to solicit the vote of the members in an election to be held by their corporation.

(2) Used for any purpose which the user does not reasonably and in good faith believe will benefit the corporation.

(3) Used for any commercial purpose or purpose in competition with the corporation.

(4) Sold to or purchased by any person.

(b) Any person who violates the provisions of subdivision (a) shall be liable for any damage such violation causes the corporation and shall account for and pay to the corporation any profit derived as a result of said violation. In addition, a court in its discretion may award exemplary damages for a fraudulent or malicious violation of subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the right of a corporation to obtain injunctive relief necessary to restrain misuse of a membership list or any part thereof.

(d) In any action or proceeding under this section, a court may award the corporation reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, in connection with such action or proceeding.

(e) As used in this section, the term “membership list” means the record of the members’ names and addresses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Service of Process [8410. - 8410.]

8410.

Service of process upon a corporation shall be governed by Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1700) of Division 1 of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Involuntary Dissolution [8510. - 8519.]

8510.

(a) A complaint for involuntary dissolution of a corporation on any one or more of the grounds specified in subdivision (b) may be filed in the superior court of the proper county by any of the following persons:

(1) One-half or more of the directors in office.

(2) A person or persons holding or authorized in writing by persons holding not less than 3313 percent of the voting power exclusive of memberships held by persons who have personally participated in any of the transactions enumerated in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(3) Any member if the ground for dissolution is that the period for which the corporation was formed has terminated without extension thereof.

(4) Any other person expressly authorized to do so in the articles.

(5) In the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust, the Attorney General.

(6) The head organization under whose authority the corporation was created, where the corporation’s articles include the provision authorized by subdivision (a), paragraph (4), clause (i), of Section 7132.

(b) The grounds for involuntary dissolution are that:

(1) The corporation has abandoned its activity for more than one year.

(2) The corporation has an even number of directors who are equally divided and cannot agree as to the management of its affairs, so that its activities can no longer be conducted to advantage or so that there is danger that its property will be impaired or lost or its activities impaired and the members are so divided into factions that they cannot elect a board consisting of an uneven number. 

(3) There is internal dissension and two or more factions of members in the corporation are so deadlocked that its activities can no longer be conducted with advantage.

(4) When during any four-year period or when all voting power has been exercised at two consecutive meetings or in two written ballots for the election of directors, whichever period is shorter, the members have failed to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon election of their successors.

(5) Those in control of the corporation have been guilty of or have knowingly countenanced persistent and pervasive fraud, mismanagement or abuse of authority or persistent unfairness toward any member or the corporation’s property is being misapplied or wasted by its directors or officers.

(6) In the case of any corporation with 35 or fewer members, liquidation is reasonably necessary for the protection of the rights or interests of a complaining member or members.

(7) The period for which the corporation was formed has terminated without extension of such period.

(8) The corporation is required to dissolve under the terms of any article provision adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), paragraph (4), clause (i) of Section 7132.

(c) At any time prior to the trial of the action any member or creditor may intervene therein.

(d) This section does not apply to any corporation subject to:

(1) The Public Utilities Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code) unless an order is obtained from the Public Utilities Commission authorizing the corporation either (a) to dispose of its assets as provided in Section 851 of the Public Utilities Code or (b) to dissolve.

(2) The provisions of Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code when the application authorized by Section 1011 of the Insurance Code has been filed by the Insurance Commissioner unless the consent of the Insurance Commissioner has been obtained.

(3) The California Credit Union Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 5 of the Financial Code).

(e) In the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust at the time of the filing of the complaint pursuant to subdivision (a), a copy thereof shall be served on the Attorney General who may intervene.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 662, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

8511.

(a) The Attorney General may bring an action against any corporation or purported corporation in the name of the people of this state, upon the Attorney General’s own information or upon complaint of a private party, to procure a judgment dissolving the corporation and annulling, vacating or forfeiting its corporate existence upon any of the following grounds:

(1) The corporation has seriously offended against any provision of the statutes regulating corporations.

(2) The corporation has fraudulently abused or usurped corporate privileges or powers.

(3) The corporation has violated any provision of law by any act or default which under the law is a ground for forfeiture of corporate existence.

(4) The corporation has failed to pay to the Franchise Tax Board for a period of five years any tax imposed upon it by the Bank and Corporation Tax Law.

(b) If the ground of the action is a matter or act which the corporation has done or omitted to do that can be corrected by amendment of its articles or by other corporate action, such suit shall not be maintained unless (1) the Attorney General, at least 30 days prior to the institution of suit, has given the corporation written notice of the matter or act done or omitted to be done and (2) the corporation has failed to institute proceedings to correct it within the 30-day period or thereafter fails to duly and properly make such amendment or take the corrective corporate action.

(c) In any such action the court may order dissolution or such other or partial relief as it deems just and expedient. The court also may appoint a receiver for winding up the affairs of the corporation or may order that the corporation be wound up by its board subject to the supervision of the court.

(d) Service of process on the corporation may be made pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1700) of Division 1 or by written notice to the president or secretary of the corporation at the address indicated in the corporation’s last tax return filed pursuant to the Bank and Corporation Tax Law. The Attorney General shall also publish one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the proper county a notice to the members of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8512.
